Utah statutes.
67-5-26.   Safety Net Initiative -- Task force -- Staff.
(1)  As used in this section, "individuals in underserved communities" means
men, women, and children living in culturally isolated communities of Utah and
northern Arizona who may lack access to justice, safety, and services.
(2)  There is created within the Office of the Attorney General the Safety Net
Initiative to:
(a)  address and prevent the crimes of domestic violence, sexual assault,
stalking, incest, and child abuse relating to individuals in underserved
communities; and
(b)  implement strategies to increase awareness and to reduce risk factors in
order to improve the safety and well-being of individuals in underserved
communities.
(3)  There is created within the Office of the Attorney General the Safety Net
Task Force, which is a statewide multi-disciplinary and multi-jurisdictional
task force focused on accomplishing the following objectives:
(a)  coordinating with government agencies, nonprofit organizations, and
interested individuals in order to work to provide open communication with
individuals in underserved communities; and
(b)  coordinating efforts to give individuals in underserved communities equal
access to justice, safety, and services.
(4)  The attorney general may employ or contract with individuals, entities,
and support staff necessary to administer the duties required by this section.
